New York, session 2025-2026, A2005.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3638 of the education law, as added by section 1 2 of subpart A of part B of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, subdivision 7 3 as added by section 19 of part A of chapter 56 of the laws of 2023, is 4 amended to read as follows: 5 § 3638. Zero-emission school buses. 1. For the purposes of this 6 section ["zero-emission]: 7 (a) "Zero-emission school bus" shall mean a school bus that: is 8 propelled by an electric motor and associated power electronics which 9 provide acceleration torque to the drive wheels during normal vehicle 10 operations and draws electricity from a hydrogen fuel cell or battery; 11 or otherwise operates without direct emission of atmospheric pollutants. 12 (b) "Opt-out waiver" shall mean a formal instrument prescribed by the 13 commissioner that a school district may submit once to the commissioner 14 to secure a permanent exemption from the requirements of this section. 15 2. (a) No later than July first, two thousand twenty-seven, unless an 16 opt-out waiver has been submitted, every school district shall: 17 (i) only purchase or lease zero-emission school buses when purchasing 18 or leasing new buses; 19 (ii) include requirements in any procurement for school transportation 20 services that any contractors providing transportation services for the 21 school district must only purchase or lease zero-emission school buses 22 when purchasing or leasing new school buses; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04567-01-5 A. 2005 2 1 (iii) include requirements in any procurement for the manufacturing or 2 retrofitting of a zero-emission school bus and charging or fueling 3 infrastructure that the components and parts used or supplied in the 4 performance of the contract or any subcontract thereto shall be produced 5 or made in whole or substantial part in the United States, its territo- 6 ries or possessions and that final assembly of the zero-emission school 7 bus and charging or fueling infrastructure shall occur in the United 8 States, its territories or possessions. 9 (b) The commissioner, in consultation with the New York state energy 10 research and development authority and office of general services, may 11 waive the contracting requirements set forth in subparagraph (iii) of 12 paragraph (a) of this subdivision if the commissioner determines that 13 the requirements would not be in the public interest, would result in 14 unreasonable costs, or that obtaining such zero-emission school buses 15 and charging or fueling infrastructure components and parts in the 16 United States would increase the cost of a school district's contract 17 for zero-emission school buses and charging or fueling infrastructure by 18 an unreasonable amount, or such zero-emission school busses and charging 19 or fueling infrastructure components and parts cannot be produced, made, 20 or assembled in the United States in sufficient and reasonably available 21 quantities or of satisfactory quality. Such determination must be made 22 on an annual basis no later than December thirty-first, after providing 23 notice and an opportunity for public comment, and be made publicly 24 available, in writing, on the department's website with a detailed 25 explanation of the findings leading to such determination. If the 26 commissioner has issued determinations for three consecutive years that 27 no such waiver is warranted pursuant to this paragraph, then the commis- 28 sioner shall no longer be required to provide the annual determinations 29 required by this paragraph. 30 3. No later than July first, two thousand thirty-five, unless an opt- 31 out waiver has been submitted, every school district shall: 32 (a) only operate and maintain zero-emission school buses; and 33 (b) include requirements in any procurement for school transportation 34 services that any contractors providing transportation services for the 35 school district must only operate zero-emission school buses when 36 providing such transportation services to the school district. 37 4. A school district that has not submitted an opt-out waiver may 38 apply to the commissioner, and the department may grant a one-time 39 extension of up to twenty-four months to comply with the requirements of 40 subdivision two of this section. The commissioner shall consider a 41 school district's effort to meet the requirements of subdivision two of 42 this section when granting an extension, including but not limited to, 43 procurement efforts made by the school district, applications for state 44 or federal funds, changes needed to school district operations to meet 45 the requirements of this section, employee training, and receipt of 46 technical assistance, if any. Upon a school district receiving an exten- 47 sion, the New York state energy research and development authority, in 48 consultation with the department, shall provide any additional technical 49 assistance necessary to the district to meet the requirements of subdi- 50 vision two of this section. 51 5. (a) Nothing in this section shall alter the rights or benefits, and 52 privileges, including, but not limited to terms and conditions of 53 employment, civil service status, and collective bargaining unit member- 54 ship, of any current employees of school districts or any entity 55 contracted to provide pupil transportation services, or services attend- A. 2005 3 1 ant thereto, including but not limited to drivers, attendants, dispatch- 2 ers, and mechanics. 3 (b) Nothing in this section shall result in: (i) the discharge, 4 displacement, or loss of position, including partial displacement such 5 as a reduction in the hours of non-overtime work, wages, or employment 6 benefits; (ii) the impairment of existing collective bargaining agree- 7 ments; (iii) the transfer of existing duties and functions; or (iv) the 8 transfer of future duties and functions, of any currently employed work- 9 er impacted by the proposed purchase or lease who agrees to be 10 retrained. 11 (c) Prior to the beginning of the procurement process for new zero-em- 12 ission school buses, omnibuses, vehicles, charging infrastructure or 13 equipment, fueling infrastructure or equipment, or other equipment, the 14 school district, private school bus company, or other employer whose 15 workers provide pupil transportation services or services attendant 16 thereto, shall create and implement a workforce development report that: 17 (i) estimates the number of current positions that would be eliminated 18 or substantially changed as a result of the purchase or lease, and the 19 number of positions expected to be created at the school district, 20 private school bus company or other employer whose workers provide pupil 21 transportation services or services attendant thereto by the proposed 22 purchase or lease over the intended life of the proposed purchase or 23 lease; (ii) identifies gaps in skills of its current workforce that are 24 needed to operate and maintain zero-emission school buses, omnibuses, 25 vehicles, charging infrastructure or equipment, fueling infrastructure 26 or equipment, or other equipment; (iii) includes a comprehensive plan to 27 transition, train, or retrain employees that are impacted by the 28 proposed purchase or lease; and (iv) contains an estimated budget to 29 transition, train, or retrain employees that are impacted by the 30 proposed purchase or lease. 31 (d) Nothing in this section shall: (i) limit rights of employees 32 pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement, or (ii) alter the exist- 33 ing representational relationships among collective bargaining represen- 34 tatives or the bargaining relationships between the employer and any 35 collective bargaining representative. Employees of public entities serv- 36 ing in positions in newly created titles shall be assigned to the appro- 37 priate bargaining unit. 38 (e) Prior to beginning the procurement process for zero-emission 39 school buses, omnibuses, vehicles, charging infrastructure or equipment, 40 fueling infrastructure or equipment, or other equipment, any employer of 41 workers covered by this section shall inform its employees' collective 42 bargaining representative of any potential impact on its members or 43 unit, including positions that may be affected, altered, or eliminated 44 as a result of the purchase. 45 6. When purchasing zero-emission school buses and charging or fueling 46 infrastructure, school districts are encouraged to utilize the central- 47 ized contracts for zero emission school buses and charging or fueling 48 infrastructure established by the office of general services. 49 7. Beginning in the two thousand twenty-four--two thousand twenty-five 50 school year, unless an opt-out waiver has been submitted, every school 51 district shall annually submit to the commissioner a progress report on 52 the implementation of zero-emission school buses as required under this 53 section in a format prescribed by the commissioner and approved by the 54 director of the budget. The report shall include, but not be limited to, 55 (i) sufficiency of the school district's electric infrastructure to 56 support anticipated electrical needs, (ii) the availability and instal- A. 2005 4 1 lation of charging or fueling stations and other components and capital 2 infrastructure required to support the transition to and full implemen- 3 tation of zero-emission school buses, (iii) whether the workforce devel- 4 opment report pursuant to paragraph (c) of subdivision five of this 5 section has been created and implemented, (iv) the number and proportion 6 of zero-emission school buses the school district or any contractor 7 providing transportation services is utilizing in the current school 8 year, and (v) the number and proportion of zero-emission school buses 9 purchased or leased by the school district or any contractor providing 10 transportation services in the current school year and the total antic- 11 ipated number for the next two years. The progress report shall be due 12 on or before August first of each year. Beginning October first, two 13 thousand twenty-four, the commissioner shall annually submit a report to 14 the governor, the temporary president of the senate and the speaker of 15 the assembly on the progress of implementation of zero-emission school 16 buses as reported by the school districts. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 18 the amendments to subdivision 7 of section 3638 of the education law 19 made by section one of this act shall not affect the repeal of such 20 subdivision and shall be deemed repealed therewith.